apertium-da-nb.da.dix
<pardef n="æg__n" c="autoconcord:nt,sp"> <!-- Neuter; ~ / ~get / ~ / ~gene -->
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sp"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>get</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>gene</l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="vals__n" c="autoconcord:ut,sgpl"> <!-- Common; ~ / ~en / ~e / ~ene; Only for nouns ending in 's' -->
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="apos__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ene</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="søskende__n" c="autoconcord:ut,sp"> <!-- Common; ~ / ~n / ~ / ~ -->
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sp"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>n</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="mis__n" c="autoconcord:ut,sgpl"> <!-- Common; ~ / ~sen / ~ser / ~serne -->
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="apos__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>sen</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ser</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>serne</l>     <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="fængs/el__n" c="autoconcord:nt,sgpl"> <!-- Neuter; ~el / ~let | (~elet) / ~ler / ~lerne -->
  <e>       <p><l>el</l>        <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>let</l>       <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>elet</l>      <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ler</l>       <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>lerne</l>     <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="sed/del__n" c="autoconcord:ut,sgpl"> <!-- Common; ~del / ~len / ~ler / ~lerne -->
  <e>       <p><l>del</l>       <r>del<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>len</l>       <r>del<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ler</l>       <r>del<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>lerne</l>     <r>del<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="trus/sel__n" c="autoconcord:ut,sgpl"> <!-- Common; ~del / ~len / ~ler / ~lerne -->
  <e>       <p><l>sel</l>       <r>sel<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>len</l>       <r>sel<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ler</l>       <r>sel<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>lerne</l>     <r>sel<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="øl__n" c="autoconcord:ut,sp"> <!-- Common; ~ / ~len / ~ | (~ler) / ~lene | (~lerne) -->
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sp"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>len</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ler</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>lene</l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>lerne</l>     <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="m/or__n" c="autoconcord:ut,sgpl"> <!-- Common; ~or / ~oren / ~ødre / ~ødrene -->
  <e>       <p><l>or</l>        <r>or<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>oren</l>      <r>or<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ødre</l>      <r>or<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ødrene</l>    <r>or<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="ton__n" c="autoconcord:nt,sgpl"> <!-- Neuter; ~ / ~net | (~nen) / ~ | (~s) / ~nene -->
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>net</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>nen</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="apos__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>nene</l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="ank/er__n" c="autoconcord:nt,sgpl"> <!-- Neuter; ~er / ~eret | (~ret / ~re / ~rene -->
  <e>       <p><l>er</l>        <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eret</l>      <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ret</l>       <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>re</l>        <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>rene</l>      <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="m/oder__n" c="autoconcord:ut,sgpl"> <!-- Common; ~oder / ~oderen / ~ødre / ~ødrene -->
  <e>       <p><l>oder</l>      <r>oder<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>oderen</l>    <r>oder<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ødre</l>      <r>oder<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ødrene</l>    <r>oder<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="anker">           <i>ank</i><par n="ank/er__n"/></e>
<e lm="fængsel">         <i>fængs</i><par n="fængs/el__n"/></e>
<e lm="eksempel">        <i>eksemp</i><par n="fængs/el__n"/></e>
<e lm="tempel">          <i>temp</i><par n="fængs/el__n"/></e>
<e lm="kapitel">         <i>kapit</i><par n="fængs/el__n"/></e>
<e lm="moder">           <i>m</i><par n="m/oder__n"/></e>
<e lm="seddel">          <i>sed</i><par n="sed/del__n"/></e>
<e lm="trussel">         <i>trus</i><par n="trus/sel__n"/></e>
<e lm="vals">            <i>vals</i><par n="vals__n"/></e>
<e lm="søskende">        <i>søskende</i><par n="søskende__n"/></e>
<e lm="æg">              <i>æg</i><par n="æg__n"/></e>
<e lm="øl" c="en øl">    <i>øl</i><par n="øl__n"/></e>
<e lm="anlæg">           <i>anlæg</i><par n="æg__n"/></e>
<e lm="skæg">            <i>skæg</i><par n="æg__n"/></e>
<e lm="bedstemor" a="PT"><i>bedstem</i><par n="m/or__n"/></e>
<e lm="tærskel" a="PT" c="domain:hus"><i>tærskel</i><par n="fængs/el__n"/></e>
<e lm="skålanker" a="PT" c="domain:sjöochhav"><i>skålank</i><par n="ank/er__n"/></e>
<e lm="kloanker" a="PT" c="domain:sjöochhav"><i>kloank</i><par n="ank/er__n"/></e>
<e lm="letvægtsanker" a="PT" c="domain:sjöochhav"><i>letvægtsank</i><par n="ank/er__n"/></e>
<e lm="pladeanker" a="PT" c="domain:sjöochhav"><i>pladeank</i><par n="ank/er__n"/></e>
<e lm="plovanker" a="PT" c="domain:sjöochhav"><i>plovank</i><par n="ank/er__n"/></e>
<e lm="sandanker" a="PT" c="domain:sjöochhav"><i>sandank</i><par n="ank/er__n"/></e>
<e lm="stokanker" a="PT" c="domain:sjöochhav"><i>stokank</i><par n="ank/er__n"/></e>
<e lm="belæg">           <i>belæg</i><par n="æg__n"/></e>
<e lm="bonus">           <i>bonus</i><par n="mis__n"/></e>
<e lm="bror">            <i>br</i><par n="m/or__n"/></e>
<e lm="broder">          <i>br</i><par n="m/oder__n"/></e>
<e lm="brændsel">        <i>brænds</i><par n="fængs/el__n"/></e>
<e lm="bus">             <i>bus</i><par n="mis__n"/></e>
<e lm="debatindlæg">     <i>debatindlæg</i><par n="æg__n"/></e>
<e lm="disk">            <i>disk</i><par n="vals__n"/></e>
<e lm="dosis">           <i>dosis</i><par n="mis__n"/></e>
<e lm="farbror">         <i>farbr</i><par n="m/or__n"/></e>
<e lm="forsvarsanlæg">   <i>forsvarsanlæg</i><par n="æg__n"/></e>
<e lm="indlæg">          <i>indlæg</i><par n="æg__n"/></e>
<e lm="iris">            <i>iris</i><par n="mis__n"/></e>
<e lm="jordemor">        <i>jordem</i><par n="m/or__n"/></e>
<e lm="kabel">           <i>kab</i><par n="fængs/el__n"/></e>
<e lm="kig">             <i>kig</i><par n="æg__n"/></e>
<e lm="konferenceanlæg"> <i>konferenceanlæg</i><par n="æg__n"/></e>
<e lm="los">             <i>los</i><par n="mis__n"/></e>
<e lm="mor">             <i>m</i><par n="m/or__n"/></e>
<e lm="mis">             <i>mis</i><par n="mis__n"/></e>
<e lm="mønster">         <i>mønst</i><par n="ank/er__n"/></e>
<e lm="kloster">         <i>klost</i><par n="ank/er__n"/></e>
<e lm="overskæg">        <i>overskæg</i><par n="æg__n"/></e>
<e lm="penis">           <i>penis</i><par n="mis__n"/></e>
<e lm="praksis">         <i>praksis</i><par n="mis__n"/></e>
<e lm="proces">          <i>proces</i><par n="mis__n"/></e>
<e lm="remis">           <i>remis</i><par n="mis__n"/></e>
<e lm="rensningsanlæg">  <i>rensningsanlæg</i><par n="æg__n"/></e>
<e lm="skianlæg">        <i>skianlæg</i><par n="æg__n"/></e>
<e lm="status">          <i>status</i><par n="mis__n"/></e>
<e lm="teater">          <i>teat</i><par n="ank/er__n"/></e>
<e lm="tillæg">          <i>tillæg</i><par n="æg__n"/></e>
<e lm="ton">             <i>ton</i><par n="ton__n"/></e>
